Alaska, session 34, HB17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 39.35.370(a) is amended to read: 04 (a) Subject to AS 39.35.450, a terminated employee is eligible for a normal 05 retirement benefit 06 (1) [AT AGE 60] with at least five years of credited service 07 (A) at age 60; or 08 (B) at any age if the terminated employee is a veteran rated 09 by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as permanently and 10 totally disabled for a service-connected condition; 11 (2) with at least 20 years of credited service as a peace officer or 12 firefighter; or 13 (3) with at least 30 years of credited service for all other employees. 14 * Sec. 2. AS 39.35.340(d), 39.35.340(i), and 39.35.541(b) are repealed. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.